test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-v_v1tehda_tehda_gt-norm-dial_Por.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - tehđa - ok: # Verb 'to do' - ok
     tehđä+V+Inf: tehđä
     tehđä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tehen
     tehđä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: tehet
     tehđä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tekkee
     tehđä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: tehemä
     tehđä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tehettä
     tehđä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tehđhään
     tehđä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tehin
     tehđä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: tehit
     tehđä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: teki
     tehđä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: tehimä
     tehđä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: tehittä
     tehđä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tehthiin
     tehđä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: tehny
     tehđä+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: tehty
     tehđä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: tehnheet
     tehđä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: tekkeevä
     tehđä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: tekkeevät
     tehđä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: tehtävä
     tehđä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: tehtävät
 
     tehđä+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: tekisin
     tehđä+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: tekisit
     tehđä+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: tekis
     tehđä+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: tekisimmä
     tehđä+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: tekisittä
     tehđä+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: tehtäis
     tehđä+V+Pass+Cond: tehtäis
     
     tehđä+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: tehe
     tehđä+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: tehkää
     
     tehđä+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: tekemässä
     tehđä+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: tekemästä
     tehđä+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: tekemhään
     tehđä+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: tekemällä
     tehđä+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: tekemättä
